District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.62

Waiver.

The Board shall waive the requirements specified in §  3-1207.61 for any cytotechnologist, histologic technician, histotechnologist, medical laboratory technician, or medical technologist who has passed an examination required by the Board, and who has received a certification from a national certifying organization acceptable to the Board that has current eligibility requirements that are equivalent to or exceed the qualifications established under this chapter.

March 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 762
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-272, § 2(f), 62 DCR 1911